California statutes. Public Resources Code
All rental income received for surface uses, including, but not limited to, surface drilling rights, upon lands under the jurisdiction of the State Lands Commission shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund, except as follows:

(a) Income from state school lands, as provided in Section 6217.5.

(b) Royalties received from extraction of minerals on the surface of those lands, as provided in Section 6217.

(c) (1) All rental income from surface uses for lands at Lake Tahoe.

(2) The rental income
 specified in paragraph (1) shall be deposited into the Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account, for expenditure upon appropriation by the Legislature pursuant to Section 6217.6.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 142.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.6.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Account” means the Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account created pursuant to this section.

(2) “Compact” means the Tahoe Regional Planning Compact.

(3) “Resources agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.

(4) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) The Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account is hereby created in the General
 Fund. The moneys in the account may be expended by the agency, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this section, with appropriate disclosure pursuant to subdivision (d). The secretary shall administer the account.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 6217, the funds in the account shall be expended as follows:

(1) The costs associated with establishing the bistate science-based advisory council established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(2) For near-shore environmental improvement program activities and projects that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) (i) Near-shore aquatic invasive species projects and projects to improve public access to sovereign land in Lake Tahoe, including planning and site
 improvement or reconstruction projects on public land, and land acquisitions from willing sellers, subject to clause (ii).

(ii) Near-shore aquatic invasive species projects and projects to improve public access to sovereign land in Lake Tahoe may be funded only if matching funds for this purpose are provided by the California Tahoe Conservancy or by another public entity. The conservancy shall coordinate the selection of projects to be funded through a collaborative process that includes the participation of other public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and private landowners, including those persons or organizations that pay the rental income described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 6217.6.

(B) (i) Near-shore water quality monitoring, subject to clause (ii).

(ii) Near-shore
 water quality monitoring may be funded only if matching funds for this purpose are provided from the Lahontan Regional Water Quality Control Board or by another public entity.

(d) The agency, or another agency designated by it, shall, on a publicly accessible Internet Web site, annually make available information regarding any activity funded pursuant to this section. The information shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The name of the agency, or agencies, to which funding was allocated.

(2) A summary of the activities and projects funded by the account.

(3) The amount allocated for the activity.

(4) An anticipated timeline and total cost for completion of the
 activity.

(e) The secretary may enter into a memorandum of agreement with the Nevada Department of Conservation and Natural Resources to establish and operate a bistate science-based advisory council in the Tahoe basin whose purpose is to promote and enhance the use of the best available scientific information on matters of interest to both states. The organization shall be nonregulatory, and shall focus on activities that will advance attainment of environmental thresholds, as provided in the compact. A majority of the governing body of that organization shall be comprised of scientists with expertise in disciplines pertinent to achieving and maintaining the goals of the compact.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6717.6.1 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 143.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.7.

All net revenues, moneys, and remittances from the sale of school lands and lieu lands shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the School Land Bank Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.8.

(a) For purposes of this section, “fund” means the Oil Trust Fund established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The Oil Trust Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury, and the moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated to the commission in accordance with this section.

(c) (1) On or before March 1, 2006, the City of Long Beach shall pay to the commission all money, including both principal and interest, in the abandonment reserve fund that the city created in 1999 and that was the subject of the litigation in State of California ex rel. California State Lands Commission v. City of Long Beach (2005) 125 Cal.App.4th 767.

(2) The Controller shall deposit in the fund any funds paid to the commission pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) On the last day of each month beginning January 31, 2025, the Controller shall transfer to the fund the amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or 50 percent of remaining oil revenue, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 4 of Chapter 138 of the Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session, whichever is greater.

(d) (1) All interest earned on the money in the abandonment reserve fund specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be transferred to the fund.

(2) The commission shall expend the money from the fund solely to finance the costs of well abandonment, pipeline removal, facility removal, remediation, and other costs associated with removal of oil and
 gas facilities from the Long Beach tidelands that are not the responsibility of other parties.

(3) All money remaining in the fund after completion of all activities described in paragraph (2) shall be transferred to the General Fund.

(e) The moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated to the commission commencing when all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The City of Long Beach adopts a resolution declaring that the oil revenue described in subdivision (d) of Section 4 of Chapter 138 of the Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session, is insufficient to fund the costs of activities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of this section.

(2) The City of Long Beach transmits to the commission a copy of the resolution and all
 necessary accompanying documentation, including a plan for expenditures for the activities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) The commission reviews the material provided in paragraph (2) and notifies the Controller within 60 calendar days of receiving the material specified in paragraph (2) that expenditure from the fund may be made so that activities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) can begin. The commission shall provide a schedule for expenditures for disbursement of moneys from the fund to the City of Long Beach. The commission shall submit a copy of the schedule to the Department of Finance and to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 164.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6218.

The commission may charge and collect reasonable fees for services performed by it, not exceeding the actual cost to the state of such services. In any case where the commission, either pursuant to law or rule of the commission, requires the publication of advertisements for bids or the publication of any notice in connection with the sale or leasing of state lands, the commission may, by rule, require that the cost of such publication be advanced by any applicant or bidder and be paid by the successful applicant or bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

6219.

The commission may, if it determines it is in the best interests of the state, accept on behalf of the state any gift, devise, grant, quitclaim, or other conveyance of title to, or interest in, real property. Such land, when acquired, shall be examined for significant environmental values as defined pursuant to Section 6370.1, and classified and administered according to the rules and regulations of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6220.

Whenever authority is not vested in another officer, agency or commission to accept quitclaim deeds on behalf of the State, the authority is vested in the State Lands Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

6221.

Any instrumentality, district, agency, or political subdivision of the state occupying or using, pursuant to law, lands owned by the state and under the jurisdiction of the commission shall comply with the provisions of this division, and the commission shall issue a permit for occupancy of such land upon application. The commission shall prescribe, by rule or regulation, a reasonable filing fee which shall accompany the application, but such fee may not exceed the average of the commission’s actual costs of receiving applications and making the initial title review for such permits. The application shall include:

(a) A description of the state lands involved, giving sufficient details or a survey tied to a record survey or monument in order to locate it accurately.

(b) The public use to be made of the land.

(c) Completed environmental documents prepared pursuant to the commission’s rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6222.

No county, city, district, political subdivision, agency or officer of the State shall request or make application to have any lands owned or controlled by the United States withdrawn or reserved from settlement, location, sale, entry or other forms of disposal under federal law until 30 days after written notice of such proposed application or request has been filed with the State Lands Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1496.)
-------------------------------------------

6223.

Applications for purchase, or lease of state lands shall be given the priority of time of filing; except that applications filed by any county, city, or officer of the State shall have priority over all other applications regardless of time of filing.

Priorities between cities, counties, or officers of the State shall be established by the time of filing of their respective applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.

The commission may adopt rules and regulations which provide for the payment of either a penalty or interest, or both, by any person who fails to pay the commission any sum when it is due under a lease or agreement. The rules and regulations may provide for the assessment, nonassessment, or waiver by the commission of the penalty or interest, or both. Penalties assessed by the commission shall not exceed 5 percent of the principal sum due and the rate of interest shall not exceed 112 percent per month from the date on which the sum became due and payable until
 the date of payment. Penalties and interest assessed pursuant to this section shall be payable to the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1463, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.1.

Any person who trespasses upon any lands owned or controlled by the state and under the jurisdiction of the commission, including, but not limited to, tidelands, submerged lands, the beds of navigable rivers, streams, lakes, bays, estuaries, inlets, or straits, or any school lands, lieu lands, or swamp and overflowed lands, without lawful authority, is liable to the state for the amount of damages which may be assessed therefor, in any civil action, in any court having jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), any person who appropriates or converts any mineral deposits reserved to, or owned by, the state and under the jurisdiction of the commission, including, but not limited to, oil and gas, other gases (including, but not limited to, nonhydrocarbon and geothermal gases), oil shale, coal, phosphate, sodium, gold, silver, alumina, silica, uranium, trona, fossils of all geological ages, metals and their compounds, alkali, alkali earth, sand, clay, gravel, salts, mineral waters, or any geothermal resources, without lawful authority, is liable to the state for treble the amount of damages which may be
 assessed therefor, in any civil action, in any court having jurisdiction.

(b) If the appropriation or conversion of any such mineral deposit was involuntary, or if the defendant in any action brought under this section had probable cause to believe that the land on which the appropriation or conversion was committed was his own or the land of the person in whose service or by whose direction such act was done, the measure of damages shall be the sum as would compensate for the actual damages.

(c) Damages awarded pursuant to this section shall be limited to those determined to have occurred within the five-year period immediately preceding the date of commencement of the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.3.

(a) A person shall not construct, place, maintain, own, use, or possess a structure or facility on land that is under the commission’s jurisdiction and that is owned by the state without first obtaining all necessary easements, leases, or permits from the commission that authorize the construction, placement, maintenance, ownership, use, or possession of the structure or facility.

(b) Except as provided
 in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 6224.5, and except for facilities owned by an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code or a gas corporation as defined in Section 222 of the Public Utilities Code, that were installed on lands pursuant to a property interest or a claim of right before the lands became state lands, a person, other than a telegraph or telephone corporation acting pursuant to Section 7901 of the Public Utilities Code or a franchised cable television corporation, as defined in Section 216.4 of the Public Utilities Code, and limited to their usage of poles, conduits, cables, wires, and associated appurtenances under either their ownership or the ownership of an electrical corporation, who violates subdivision (a) shall be liable for a penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) a day or an amount that is not more than 60 percent higher than the full fair market rental for each month that a violation occurs. If the violation occurs during
 only part of a calendar month, the commission may prorate the penalty.

(c) In determining the appropriate penalty described in subdivision (b), the commission shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) The physical extent of the violation on the land under the commission’s jurisdiction, and that is owned by the state.

(2) The degree of culpability of the violator.

(3) The degree of cooperation of the violator and whether the structure or facility is susceptible to removal or the violation is susceptible to resolution.

(4) Any prior history of violations of statutes or leases pertaining to lands under the commission’s jurisdiction, and that are owned by the state, including the past
 history of the violator in taking all feasible steps or procedures necessary or appropriate to correct a violation.

 (5) The extent to which the violation causes environmental harm or impairs lawful public access to lands under the commission’s jurisdiction, and that are owned by the state.

(6) Any factor determined by the commission to be relevant to a fair and just result, and in the best interest of the state.

(d) The penalty described in this section shall be imposed from the first day the commission issues an order to the day when the violation is cured.

(e) The commission may enjoin a person who violates subdivision (a) from continuing that violation.

(f) The commission may require a
 person who violates subdivision (a) to remove the structure or facility from lands that are owned by the state at the person’s own expense. If the violator refuses to remove the structure or facility, or if the violator cannot be located, the commission may, at its own expense, remove the structure or facility from the land under the commission’s jurisdiction, and that is owned by the state. The commission may pursue whatever legal remedies are available to recover the removal costs from the violator.

(g) For the purposes of this section, a structure or facility shall include, but is not limited to, buildings, boat houses, docks, piers, revetments, fill, pilings, pipelines, groins, jetties, seawalls, breakwaters, and bulkheads.

(h) If the Attorney General prevails in a civil action necessary to enforce an order of the commission issued pursuant to this section, the Attorney
 General shall be awarded attorney’s fees and costs.

(i) The remedies provided by this section are in addition to and not in lieu of any other penalty or sanction provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (AB 2082)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.4.

(a) Before the commission considers whether to pursue a remedy provided under Section 6224.3, the commission shall first provide a written notice to the person against whom the commission seeks to impose the penalty. The notice shall include an opportunity for a hearing before the commission at a properly noticed public meeting. The commission shall send the notice not less than 30 days before the date set for conducting a hearing pursuant to this section. A notice
 shall include all of the following:

(1) The date, time, and location of the commission hearing where the person may appear and be heard.

(2) A statement of the authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held.

(3) A reference to the particular sections of the statutes and rules involved.

(4) A short and plain statement of the matters asserted or charged, including a description of the violation complained of with reasonable certainty as to its character and location.

(5) A statement indicating whether and under what circumstances an order by default may be entered.

(b) In lieu of personal service, service of
 notice may be made by registered mail and by posting a copy of the notice on the structure or facility that is in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 6224.3.

(c) If the person fails to appear at the noticed hearing, the commission may issue an order.

(d) A hearing shall be scheduled as a regular calendar item at a properly noticed commission meeting. A commission member shall serve as a presiding officer at a hearing held pursuant to this section and conduct the hearing in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including Article 10 (commencing with Section 11445.10) of that chapter.

(e) A person against whom the commission has issued an order imposing a remedy provided in Section 6224.3 may seek review of the order pursuant to Section
 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure by filing a petition for writ of mandate within 60 days after the commission’s action has become final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (AB 2082)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.5.

(a) If, as of January 1, 2013, a person is in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 6224.3, that person shall not be subject to a penalty pursuant to that section, if the person, on or before July 1, 2013, remedies the violation or submits to the commission a completed lease application, including the payment of all fees and costs. The remedy may include, but is not limited to, entering into an
 appropriate lease with the commission or adequately removing the structure or facility.

(b) A person shall not be subject to a penalty or order pursuant to Section 6224.3, if the person submits a notice to the commission that a structure or facility owned by that person is potentially in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 6224.3 and the person, within six months from the date the notice is received by the commission, remedies the violation or submits to the commission a completed lease application, including the payment of all fees and costs. This subdivision shall apply only if the potential violator submits a notice to the commission before the commission otherwise receives notice or information regarding the potential violation, or takes action against the violator.

(c) If any pole, conduit, cable, wire, pipeline, or associated appurtenance that is owned by an electrical
 corporation, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, or a gas corporation, as defined in Section 222 of the Public Utilities Code, violates subdivision (a) of Section 6224.3, and the electrical or gas corporation can demonstrate that it has not received actual notice that it does not have adequate existing land rights for its structure or facility located on land under the commission’s jurisdiction, the electrical or gas corporation shall not be subject to a penalty or order pursuant to Section 6224.3 if the electrical or gas corporation remedies the violation or submits to the commission a completed lease application, including the payment of all fees and costs, or files with a court of competent jurisdiction a motion to perfect a prescriptive easement within six months from the date the violation is reported or the mistake is discovered.

(d) The commission may adopt regulations necessary or useful to carry out this section and
 Sections 6224.3 and 6224.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 172.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6225.

(a) The commission shall conduct research, investigations, and title searches on the real property in this state of the beaches of Lake Tahoe which is dedicated for public use and make a report of its findings which shall be open for public inspection. For the purpose of this section the commission may contract upon such terms and conditions as will be in the best interest of the people of the state with one or more private persons, firms, associations, organizations, partnerships, corporations, companies, or public agencies to conduct such research, investigations, and title searches.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever it appears by final decree of any court of competent jurisdiction that title to any beach property of Lake Tahoe, for which the commission in cooperation with the county has conducted a title search, is vested in a county, the county shall dedicate such beach property to the state.

(c) The state shall be under no obligation to operate and maintain the beach property so dedicated to the state. The county or a public agency in which the beach property is situated may, subject to approval of the commission, operate, maintain, or make improvements on such beach property.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6224 (as added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1397) by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.2. Sea Grant Program [6230. - 6238.]

6230.

An amount specified in the annual Budget Act shall be available for distribution for public and private higher education for use as up to two-thirds of the local matching share for projects under the National Sea Grant College and Program Act of 1966 (P.L. 89-688) approved, upon the recommendation of the advisory panel appointed pursuant to Section 6232, by the Secretary of the Resources Agency or the secretary’s designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 177.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6231.

There shall be a Sea Grant Advisory Panel consisting of 17 members as provided in Sections 6232, 6233, and 6234. The advisory panel shall do all of the following:

(a) Review all applications for funding under this section and make recommendations based upon the priorities it establishes.

(b) Periodically review progress on sea grant research projects subsequent to their approval and funding under this chapter.

(c) Make recommendations to the Secretary of the Resources Agency with respect to the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 178.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6232.

The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall appoint the following members of the advisory panel, who shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary:

(a) A representative of the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) A representative of the Department of Conservation.

(c) A representative of the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(d) The Executive Director of the California Coastal Commission or the executive director’s designee.

(e) A representative of the fish industry.

(f) A representative of the aquaculture industry.

(g) A representative of the ocean engineering industry.

(h) A representative of the University of California.

(i) A representative of the California State University.

(j) A representative of a private California institution of higher education that is participating in the National Sea Grant Program.

(k) A representative of the State Lands Commission.

(l) A representative of the Office of Environmental Health
 Hazard Assessment.

(m) A representative of the State Water Resources Control Board.

(n) A representative of the Office of Oil Spill Prevention and Response in the Department of Fish and Wildlife, designated by the administrator for oil spill response.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 113, Sec. 8.   (AB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6233.

(a) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint one Member of the Senate to the advisory panel, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Senate Committee on Rules.

(b) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one Member of the Assembly to the advisory panel, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Speaker. This member shall not be of the same political party as the member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6234.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency, or the secretary’s designee shall be a member of the advisory panel and shall serve as chairperson of the advisory panel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6235.

All advisory panel members shall serve without compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6236.

The Sea Grant research projects selected for the state support under this chapter shall have a clearly defined benefit to the people of the State of California. Those projects, to be conducted by universities, colleges, or other institutions participating in the California Sea Grant College Program, shall be applicable to marine and coastal resources management, policy, science, and engineering issues that face this state now or in the reasonably foreseeable future.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6237.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the funding provided by this chapter is needed to stimulate the development and utilization of ocean and coastal resources by working constructively with private sector firms and individuals.

(b) The Legislature further recognizes the high productivity of the California Sea Grant College Program, the only statewide program systematically devoted to supporting fundamental research, education, and extension activities on the diversity of problems related to marine resources protection and development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6238.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude the application for funding of any project that would be eligible for funding under the terms of the National Sea Grant College and Program Act of 1966.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.4. California Coastal Sanctuary [6240. - 6245.]

6240.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Coastal Sanctuary Act of 1994.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6241.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that offshore oil and gas production in certain areas of state waters poses an unacceptably high risk of damage and disruption to the marine environment of the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6242.

(a) A California Coastal Sanctuary is hereby created which includes all state waters subject to tidal influence, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) The California Coastal Sanctuary shall not include any state waters subject to a lease for the extraction of oil or gas in effect on January 1, 1995, unless the lease is deeded or otherwise reverts to the state after that date.

(c) The California Coastal Sanctuary shall not include any state waters situated east of the Carquinez Bridges on Interstate 80.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6243.

Notwithstanding any provision of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6870) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 or any other provision of law, no state agency or state officer shall enter into any new lease for the extraction of oil or gas from the California Coastal Sanctuary, unless the President of the United States has found a severe energy supply interruption and has ordered distribution of the Strategic Petroleum Reserve pursuant to Section 6241(d) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the Governor finds that the energy resources of the sanctuary will contribute significantly to the alleviation of that interruption, and the Legislature subsequently acts to amend this chapter to allow that extraction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6244.

The commission may enter into any lease for the extraction of oil or gas from state-owned tide and submerged lands in the California Coastal Sanctuary if the commission determines that those oil or gas deposits are being drained by means of producing wells upon adjacent federal lands and the lease is in the best interests of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6245.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), the commission or a local trustee shall not enter into any new lease or other conveyance authorizing new construction of oil- and gas-related infrastructure upon tidelands and submerged lands
 within state waters associated with Pacific Outer Continental Shelf leases issued after January 1, 2018.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of an application for a lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification to authorize new construction of oil- and gas-related infrastructure upon tidelands and submerged lands within state waters associated with Pacific Outer Continental Shelf leases issued after January 1, 2018, the commission or local trustee shall provide notice of this application by including it as a separate informational item on the agenda of the commission’s or local trustee’s next duly noticed public meeting. Summary information about the requested lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification shall
 be included in the agenda summary.

(2) Notwithstanding the Permit Streamlining Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 65920) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code), the commission or local trustee shall take no further action to approve the requested lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification until 180 days after the notification required in paragraph (1).

(c) Prior to approving any lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification to authorize new construction of oil- and gas-related infrastructure upon tidelands and submerged lands within state waters associated with Pacific Outer Continental Shelf leases issued after January 1, 2018, the commission or local trustee shall consider, at a minimum, the following:

(1) Whether the lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification is
 necessary to protect the marine environment or to ensure human health and safety.

(2) Whether the lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification provides a benefit to the state beyond additional lease revenues.

(3) Whether the lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification will impact the volume of oil and gas that may be transported across state waters.

(d) (1) Any lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification that will increase the volume of oil and gas conveyed across state waters shall not be approved at the same properly noticed public meeting at which the lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification is first presented.

(2) The commission or local trustee shall accept public comments at the same
 meeting at which it votes to approve or disapprove any lease renewal, extension, amendment, or modification that will increase the volume of oil and gas conveyed across state waters. Any lease subject to this section shall be approved by a vote of the commission or the governing board of the local trustee.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any of the following:

(1) The commission from issuing leases pursuant to Section 6243 or 6244.

(2) Any activity
 undertaken to repair or maintain any pipeline or other infrastructure used to convey oil or natural gas or any other activity necessary to ensure the safe operation of infrastructure used in the exploration, development, or production of oil or natural gas.

(3) Any activity undertaken to convey oil or natural gas produced from state waters.

(f) The commission may establish regulations for the implementation of this section.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Local trustee” means a local trustee of granted public trust lands that is a county, city, or district, including water, sanitary, regional park, port, or harbor districts, or
 any other local political or corporate subdivision that has been granted public trust lands through a legislative grant.

(2) “Pacific Outer Continental Shelf” means all submerged lands lying seaward of California, Hawaii, Oregon, and Washington and outside of the area of lands beneath navigable waters, as set forth by the
 federal Submerged Lands Act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 1331), and all of which appertain to the United States and are subject to its jurisdiction and control.

(3) “State waters” has the same meaning as defined in Section 36108.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Administration and Control of Swamp, Overflowed, Tide, or Submerged Lands, and Structures Thereon [6301. - 6360.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration and Control Generally [6301. - 6314.]

6301.

The commission has exclusive jurisdiction over all ungranted tidelands and submerged lands owned by the State, and of the beds of navigable rivers, streams, lakes, bays, estuaries, inlets, and straits, including tidelands and submerged lands or any interest therein, whether within or beyond the boundaries of the State as established by law, which have been or may be acquired by the State (a) by quitclaim, cession, grant, contract, or otherwise from the United States or any agency thereof, or (b) by any other means. All jurisdiction and authority remaining in the State as to tidelands and submerged lands as to which grants have been or may be made is vested in the commission.

The commission shall exclusively administer and control all such lands, and may lease or otherwise dispose of such lands, as provided by law, upon such terms and for such consideration, if any, as are determined by it.

The provisions of this section do not apply to land of the classes described in Section 6403, as added by Chapter 227 of the Statutes of 1947.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.2.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of the Governor’s Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1969 for the Reorganization of the Executive Branch of California State Government, if such reorganization plan becomes effective pursuant to Section 12080.5 of the Government Code, it shall have no effect whatever upon the nonmineral management functions, authorities, and responsibilities of state tidelands and submerged lands lying below such tidelands, and swamp and overflow lands affected by tides, including any such lands granted to a local agency (including, but not limited to, any of the tidelands and submerged lands which have been granted in trust to the City of Long Beach), currently within the jurisdiction of the commission. The Legislative Counsel shall include the exclusion of such functions, authorities, and responsibilities of the commission from the transfers of functions provided for by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1969 in preparing the bill required pursuant to Section 12081 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1593.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.5.
